Mississippi, session 2026, HB4034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities of the City of Greenwood, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the acquisition of essential municipal vehicles for the Police Department, Fire Department, Public Works Department and Wastewater Treatment Division, and retiring or reducing existing long-term debt obligations incurred to acquire and maintain municipal vehicles, as described in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 2,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used as follows: (a)  One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) for the acquisition of patrol and supervisory vehicles for the Police Department; fire engines, support vehicles and command units for the Fire Department; dump trucks and utility/service vehicles for the Public Works Department; and vacuum trucks and maintenance vehicles for the Wastewater Treatment Division; and (b)  One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) for retiring or reducing existing bonds and department-generated loans that were incurred to acquire and maintain vehicles for the departments and division listed in paragraph (a) of this section. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.